Utah, session 2026, HB64.
Section 1. Section 53C-4-401 is enacted to read:4. Culturally or Scientifically Significant Sites53C-4-401. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"County legislative body" means a legislative body of a county government described in Title 17, Chapter 52a, Part 2, Forms of County Government.(2)"Culturally or scientifically significant site" means a site, structure, or natural feature:(a)located on trust lands;(b)containing archaeological, cultural, historical, paleontological, or scientific significance; and(c)approved and listed by the administration under Section 53C-4-404.(3)"Nomination" means the process for nominating a proposed culturally or scientifically significant site described in Subsection 53C-4-402(1).(4)"Qualified county" means a county: (a)of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class, as described in Section 17-60-104; and(b)that has trust lands located within the county's jurisdictional boundaries.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53C-4-402 is enacted to read:53C-4-402. Nomination of a culturally or scientifically significant site -- Notification -- Scope.(1)(a)A county legislative body of a qualified county may nominate a proposed culturally or scientifically significant site within the qualified county's jurisdictional boundaries for the director to approve as a culturally or scientifically significant site.(b)To nominate a proposed culturally or scientifically significant site, a county legislative body shall submit the nomination:(i)in accordance with the requirements described in Section 53C-4-403; and(ii)in a form and manner determined by the director.(2)(a)Before January 1, 2027, the director shall notify, by certified mail, the county legislative body of each qualified county of the opportunity to nominate a proposed culturally or scientifically significant site.(b)The director's notification shall include:(i)a physical map or link to an electronic map depicting trust lands located within the qualified county's jurisdictional boundaries; and(ii)information about the requirements and procedure for submitting a nomination to the administration.(3)Nothing in this part is intended to supersede, replace, or otherwise affect the provisions of Title 9, Chapter 8a, State Historic Preservation Office.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53C-4-403 is enacted to read:53C-4-403. Nomination requirements -- Excluded lands.(1)A nomination of a proposed culturally or scientifically significant site shall include:(a)a map or legal description of the proposed culturally or scientifically significant site with sufficient detail to document the location and acreage of the site;(b)the county legislative body's rationale for deeming the location a culturally or scientifically significant site, including evidence regarding the cultural or scientific significance of the site;(c)documentation of the public notification and consultation process used by the county legislative body to gather input from county residents and stakeholders;(d)a copy of a resolution adopted by the county legislative body expressing the county legislative body's support for the nomination; and(e)a proposal by the county legislative body for how to preserve the site, including by purchase, exchange, conservation easement, or other preservation measure.(2)A proposed culturally or scientifically significant site may not:(a)exceed either:(i)the smallest area necessary for the proper care, management, and conservation of the site; or(ii)640 acres; or(b)include lands containing:(i)deposits of coal, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon resources;(ii)mineral resources; or(iii)geothermal resources.(3)A county legislative body may submit a nomination no later than 24 months after the day the county legislative body receives the director's notification described in Subsection 53C-4-402(2).(4)Except for the resubmission requirement described in Subsection 53C-4-404(1)(d), a county legislative body may not submit more than two nominations.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53C-4-404 is enacted to read:53C-4-404. Review by director -- List of approved culturally or scientifically significant sites.(1)(a)The director shall approve or reject a nomination no later than 180 days after the day on which the director receives the nomination.(b)The director shall approve a nomination that the director determines is consistent with the requirements described in Section 53C-4-403.(c)The director may reject a nomination that the director determines, in the director's sole discretion, is inconsistent with the requirements described in Section 53C-4-403.(d)Notwithstanding Subsections 53C-4-403(3) and (4), if the director rejects a nomination, the director shall allow the county legislative body that submitted the nomination a reasonable amount of time to:(i)resolve a deficiency in the nomination; and(ii)resubmit the nomination.(2)(a)The director shall maintain a list of approved nominations.(b)The director shall review the list periodically to:(i)ensure the nomination requirements described in Section 53C-4-403 are adequate to identify a culturally or scientifically significant site; and(ii)recommend that the Legislature modify or add a nomination requirement, as needed.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53C-4-405 is enacted to read:53C-4-405. Preservation measures.(1)If the director determines that an imminent action might result in a change to the character of a culturally or scientifically significant site, the director may:(a)consult with the county legislative body that nominated the site to determine the county legislative body's interest in preserving the site through purchase, exchange, conservation easement, or other preservation measure;(b)consider potential effects to the site when planning development or other activities on the site; or(c)restrict or modify a development plan or other activity to preserve the site, when commercially feasible, which may include:(i)notifying prospective developers, lessees, or purchasers of the site before leasing, selling, or permitting a development activity;(ii)utilizing a deed restriction or protective covenant; or(iii)other preservation measures that the director deems appropriate.(2)The director may not take an action under this section that is inconsistent with Subsection 53C-1-102(2).

Section 6:
Section 6.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.